Utah statutes.
53-3-214.8.   License or identification card checkoff for public
transportation for seniors or people with disabilities.
(1)  A person who applies for a license or identification card or a renewal of
a license or identification card may designate a voluntary contribution of $1
for public transportation assistance for seniors or people with disabilities.
(2)  This contribution shall be:
(a)  collected by the division;
(b)  treated as a voluntary contribution to the "Out and About" Homebound
Transportation Assistance Fund created in Section 62A-3-110 to provide public
transportation assistance for seniors or people with disabilities and not as a
license fee; and
(c)  transferred to the "Out and About" Homebound Transportation Assistance
Fund created in Section 62A-3-110 at least monthly, less actual administrative
costs associated with collecting and transferring the contributions.
